bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aroeinltcsdumpbgvfhzóíjqáéñxyúüCkAMIESPGRJBFDVTHUOwLNKZÁY

SFX A Y 93
SFX A é ito é
SFX A é ita é
SFX A é ote é
SFX A é ota é
SFX A a illa a
SFX A a illas a
SFX A a ita a
SFX A a itas a
SFX A a ota a
SFX A a otas a
SFX A ar illa ar
SFX A ar illas ar 
SFX A ar ita ar
SFX A ar itas ar
SFX A ar ota ar
SFX A ar otas ar
SFX A co quilla co
SFX A co quillas co
SFX A co quillo co
SFX A co quillos co
SFX A co quita co
SFX A co quitas co
SFX A co quito co
SFX A co quitos co
SFX A e ita e
SFX A e itas e
SFX A e ito e
SFX A e itos e
SFX A e illo e
SFX A e illos e
SFX A a ote e
SFX A go guillo go
SFX A go guillos go
SFX A go guito go
SFX A go guitos go
SFX A io illa io
SFX A io illas io
SFX A io ita io
SFX A io itas io
SFX A io illo io
SFX A io illos io
SFX A io ito io
SFX A io itos io
SFX A o ito o
SFX A o itos o
SFX A o illo o
SFX A o illos o
SFX A o ita o
SFX A o itas o
SFX A o illa o
SFX A o illas o
SFX A o ota o
SFX A o otas o
SFX A o ote o
SFX A o otes o
SFX A te tillo te
SFX A te tillos te
SFX A te tito te
SFX A te titos te
SFX A te tote te
SFX A te totes te
SFX A zo cilla zo
SFX A zo cillas zo
SFX A zo cillo zo
SFX A zo cillos zo
SFX A zo cita zo
SFX A zo citas zo
SFX A zo cito zo
SFX A zo citos zo
SFX A 0 cilla [er]
SFX A 0 cillas [er]
SFX A 0 cillo [er]
SFX A 0 cillos [er]
SFX A 0 cito [er]
SFX A 0 citos [er]
SFX A 0 cita [er]
SFX A 0 citas [er]
SFX A 0 sote [er]
SFX A 0 sotes [er]
SFX A 0 sota [er]
SFX A 0 sotas [er]
SFX A 0 illa [ls]
SFX A 0 illas [ls]
SFX A 0 illo [ls]
SFX A 0 illos [ls]
SFX A 0 ita [ls]
SFX A 0 itas [ls]
SFX A 0 ito [ls]
SFX A 0 itos [ls]
SFX A 0 ota [ls]
SFX A 0 otas [ls]
SFX A 0 ote [ls]
SFX A 0 otes [ls]

SFX J Y 12
SFX J e ísimo e
SFX J e ísimos e
SFX J e ísima e
SFX J e ísimas e
SFX J o ísimo o
SFX J o ísima o
SFX J o ísimos o
SFX J o ísimas o
SFX J 0 ísimo l
SFX J 0 ísima l
SFX J 0 ísimos l
SFX J 0 ísimas l

SFX M Y 8
SFX M ble bilidad ble
SFX M ble bilidades ble
SFX M o idad o
SFX M o idades o
SFX M o amente o
SFX M 0 idad [elnrsz]
SFX M 0 idades [elnrsz]
SFX M 0 mente [elnrsz]

SFX N Y 2
SFX N r damente [ai]r
SFX N er idamente er

SFX P Y 20
SFX P e a e
SFX P o a o
SFX P 0 s [eo]
SFX P o as o
SFX P e as e
SFX P án ana án
SFX P án anes án
SFX P án anas án
SFX P ín ina ín
SFX P ín ines ín
SFX P ín inas ín
SFX P ón ona ón
SFX P ón ones ón
SFX P ón onas ón
SFX P 0 a [^aons]
SFX P 0 es [^aons]
SFX P 0 as [^aons]
SFX P és esa és
SFX P és eses és
SFX P és esas és

SFX H Y 2
SFX H r ción [ai]r
SFX H r ciones [ai]r

SFX I Y 4
SFX I r miento [ai]r
SFX I r mientos [ai]r
SFX I er imiento er
SFX I er imientos er

SFX L Y 6
SFX L r nte ar
SFX L r ntes ar
SFX L er iente er
SFX L er ientes er
SFX L r ente ir
SFX L r entes ir

SFX R Y 20
SFX R 0 me [aei]r
SFX R 0 te [aei]r
SFX R 0 se [aei]r
SFX R 0 nos [aei]r
SFX R 0 os [aei]r
SFX R ar ándome ar
SFX R ar ándote ar
SFX R ar ándose ar
SFX R ar ándonos ar
SFX R ar ándoos ar
SFX R er iéndome er
SFX R er iéndote er
SFX R er iéndose er
SFX R er iéndonos er
SFX R er iéndoos er
SFX R r éndome ir
SFX R r éndote ir
SFX R r éndose ir
SFX R r éndonos ir
SFX R r éndoos ir

SFX S Y 11
SFX S 0 s [aeiouáéó]
SFX S 0 es [úídjlry]
SFX S z ces z
SFX S 0 es [^é]s
SFX S 0 es [^áéíóú]n
SFX S án anes án
SFX S én enes én
SFX S ín ines ín
SFX S ón ones ón
SFX S ún unes ún
SFX S és eses és

SFX T Y 24
SFX T 0 lo [aei]r
SFX T 0 la [aei]r
SFX T 0 le [aei]r
SFX T 0 los [aei]r
SFX T 0 las [aei]r
SFX T 0 les [aei]r
SFX T ar ándolo ar
SFX T ar ándola ar
SFX T ar ándole ar
SFX T ar ándolos ar
SFX T ar ándolas ar
SFX T ar ándoles ar
SFX T er iéndolo er
SFX T er iéndola er
SFX T er iéndole er
SFX T er iéndolos er
SFX T er iéndolas er
SFX T er iéndoles er
SFX T r éndolo ir
SFX T r éndola ir
SFX T r éndole ir
SFX T r éndolos ir
SFX T r éndolas ir
SFX T r éndoles ir

SFX U Y 120
SFX U ar ármelo ar
SFX U ar ártelo ar
SFX U ar árselo ar
SFX U ar árnoslo ar
SFX U ar ároslo ar
SFX U ar ármela ar
SFX U ar ártela ar
SFX U ar ársela ar
SFX U ar árnosla ar
SFX U ar árosla ar
SFX U ar ármelos ar
SFX U ar ártelos ar
SFX U ar árselos ar
SFX U ar árnoslos ar
SFX U ar ároslos ar
SFX U ar ármelas ar
SFX U ar ártelas ar
SFX U ar árselas ar
SFX U ar árnoslas ar
SFX U ar ároslas ar
SFX U ar ándomelo ar
SFX U ar ándotelo ar
SFX U ar ándoselo ar
SFX U ar ándonoslo ar
SFX U ar ándooslo ar
SFX U ar ándomela ar
SFX U ar ándotela ar
SFX U ar ándosela ar
SFX U ar ándonosla ar
SFX U ar ándoosla ar
SFX U ar ándomelos ar
SFX U ar ándotelos ar
SFX U ar ándoselos ar
SFX U ar ándonoslos ar
SFX U ar ándooslos ar
SFX U ar ándomelas ar
SFX U ar ándotelas ar
SFX U ar ándoselas ar
SFX U ar ándonoslas ar
SFX U ar ándooslas ar
SFX U er érmelo er
SFX U er értelo er
SFX U er érselo er
SFX U er érnoslo er
SFX U er éroslo er
SFX U er érmela er
SFX U er értela er
SFX U er érsela er
SFX U er érnosla er
SFX U er érosla er
SFX U er érmelos er
SFX U er értelos er
SFX U er érselos er
SFX U er érnoslos er
SFX U er éroslos er
SFX U er érmelas er
SFX U er értelas er
SFX U er érselas er
SFX U er érnoslas er
SFX U er éroslas er
SFX U er iéndomelo er
SFX U er iéndotelo er
SFX U er iéndoselo er
SFX U er iéndonoslo er
SFX U er iéndooslo er
SFX U er iéndomela er
SFX U er iéndotela er
SFX U er iéndosela er
SFX U er iéndonosla er
SFX U er iéndoosla er
SFX U er iéndomelos er
SFX U er iéndotelos er
SFX U er iéndoselos er
SFX U er iéndonoslos er
SFX U er iéndooslos er
SFX U er iéndomelas er
SFX U er iéndotelas er
SFX U er iéndoselas er
SFX U er iéndonoslas er
SFX U er iéndooslas er
SFX U ir írmelo ir
SFX U ir írtelo ir
SFX U ir írselo ir
SFX U ir írnoslo ir
SFX U ir íroslo ir
SFX U ir írmela ir
SFX U ir írtela ir
SFX U ir írsela ir
SFX U ir írnosla ir
SFX U ir írosla ir
SFX U ir írmelas ir
SFX U ir írtelas ir
SFX U ir írselas ir
SFX U ir írnoslas ir
SFX U ir íroslas ir
SFX U ir írmelos ir
SFX U ir írtelos ir
SFX U ir írselos ir
SFX U ir írnoslos ir
SFX U ir íroslos ir
SFX U r éndomelo ir
SFX U r éndotelo ir
SFX U r éndoselo ir
SFX U r éndonoslo ir
SFX U r éndooslo ir
SFX U r éndomela ir
SFX U r éndotela ir
SFX U r éndosela ir
SFX U r éndonosla ir
SFX U r éndoosla ir
SFX U r éndomelos ir
SFX U r éndotelos ir
SFX U r éndoselos ir
SFX U r éndonoslos ir
SFX U r éndooslos ir
SFX U r éndomelas ir
SFX U r éndotelas ir
SFX U r éndoselas ir
SFX U r éndonoslas ir
SFX U r éndooslas ir
