bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
Adriel/AP
Anolfo/AP
Juan/APS
abreviar/HINPRSTUVX
abuñolar/PSWX
aburrir/INOQRTVWX
acalorar/INPRSTVX
accidentar/PRSTVX
aceitoso/APS
acercar/IPRSTUVWX
acertar/INPRSTUWX
acompasar/NPSVWX
acoquinar/IPRSTVWX
adivinar/HIPSTVWX
adjetivar/HPSVWX
administrar/HPRSTUVWX
adoptar/LPRSTUVWX
adormecer/IOQRTWX
adorno/APS
adular/HLPSTVWX
afilar/IPRSTVWX
afligir/INOQRTVWX
aflojar/IPRSTVWX
aftoso/MPS
aguantar/PRSTVWX
ahuecar/IPRSTVWX
aislar/ILNPRSTVWX
alabar/IPRSTVWX
albo/APS
alficoz/S
almenar/NPSVWX
alto/AJMPS
altozano/PS
amar/HLPRSTVWX
amenazar/LPRSTVWX
ametrallar/IPSVWX
amigue/JS
amortiguar/HIPRSTVX
amparo/APS
amplificar/HLPSVWX
anfisbena/S
anticipar/HILNPRSTUVWX
antisocial/MS
anuro/PS
apantallar/IPRSTVWX
aposentar/IPRSTVX
apretujar/PRSTVWX
apropiar/HNPRSTUVX
apuntalar/IPSVWX
arabizar/HPSVWX
arbusto/AS
arder/LVWX
arqueológico/MPS
asainetear/PSVWX
asegurar/HIPRSTUVWX
aserrar/PSTWX
atajar/IPSTVWX
atender/IOQRTWX
auto/AS
avellanar/PSTVWX
azogar/IPSVX
azorar/ILPRSTVX
azulear/PSVWX
baenero/PS
bajo/AJPS
baldío/MPS
bandolero/APS
batir/ILORVWX
beatificar/HPSVWX
beato/AJPS
bello/JMPS
biomédico/PS
bono/AJS
borbolleo/PS
cablear/PSVWX
cachete/APS
callar/INPRSTVWX
cambiar/ILPRSTUVX
canastero/PS
candonguear/PSTVWX
característico/MPS
caravana/AS
cargar/LPRSTUVWX
carlita/S
centralizar/HPSVWX
cervantófilo/PS
cervato/AS
chilenismo/S
cicatrizar/HLPRSTVWX
cierto/JMPS
cifrar/NPRSTVWX
clavar/PRSTVWX
cobijo/APS
coligar/HIPRSVWX
colorar/HLPSVX
comerciable/MS
compasar/NPSVWX
complementar/PRSTUVX
complutense/S
comprobar/HLPRSTUWX
condicionar/ILNPSTVX
condoler/ORWX
configurar/HPRSTUVWX
considerable/MS
consolidar/HPRSTUVWX
consonar/LPSVX
consumar/HPSTVWX
copiar/LPRSTUVX
coquizar/PSTVWX
corrector/PS
cortar/LPRSTUVX
cortinilla/S
costoso/JMPS
cristiano/JMPS
cuadrado/APS
culminar/HLPSVWX
culpable/MS
culpar/HNPRSTVWX
curtir/ILOQRTVWX
decrecer/ILWX
dedicar/HPRSTUVWX
defender/OQRTWX
deliberar/HLNPSVWX
delimitar/HPRSTVWX
demudar/HIPRSTVWX
dental/S
desacatar/IPRSTVWX
desacordar/NPRSTWX
desaojar/PSTVWX
desapropiar/HIPRSVX
desaprovechar/IPSVWX
descoagular/LPSVWX
desconectar/PRSTVWX
desconsiderar/HNPSVWX
descortinar/PSVWX
desdoblar/IPRSTVX
desecar/HILPSVWX
desencerrar/PRSTUWX
desgorrar/PRSVWX
desgraciar/NPRSTVX
deshollinador/PS
desimanar/HPSVWX
desinteresar/NPRSVX
desmandar/IPRSTVX
desnarigar/PSVWX
desperfecto/AS
desplazar/IPRSTUVWX
despoblar/HIPSWX
desportillar/PRSTVWX
destacable/MS
destornillar/IPSVWX
destre/JS
detallar/NPRSTVWX
determinar/HILPRSTVWX
diferenciar/HPRSTUVX
difuminar/PRSTVWX
diluviar/PSVX
diploma/AS
diputar/HPSVWX
disolver/OQRTWY
disparatar/NPSVWX
dormir/LOWY
dual/MS
edificar/HPSTVWX
educar/HPRSTVWX
eliminar/HPRSTUVWX
embasamiento/S
embijar/PSVWX
emborrazar/IPSTVWX
embriagar/LPRSTVWX
eminente/JMS
empeñoso/APS
enardecer/IOQRTWX
encarrujar/PRSVWX
enchiquerar/IPSVWX
encrespar/IPRSTVWX
enfeudar/HPSVWX
engarzar/PRSTVWX
engorronar/PRSVX
enjero/S
enlazar/IPRSTVWX
enorme/JMS
entarquinar/IPSVWX
enterrar/IPRSTUWX
entortar/PRSTVX
errar/LNPSVWX
escatimoso/MPS
esclarecer/IQTWX
escopetazo/S
escudar/PRSTVWX
esmerilar/PSTVWX
espanto/APS
esquejar/PRSTUVWX
estabilizar/HPRSTUVWX
estampar/HPRSTUVWX
estipular/HPRSTUVWX
estoque/AS
estovar/PRSTUVX
estrellar/IPRSTUVWX
estropajoso/MPS
etcétera/S
evaluar/HPRSTUWX
excelente/JMS
excitar/HLPRSTUVWX
exclaustrar/HPRSTUVWX
exhalar/HPRSTUVWX
expansionar/PRSTUVX
expectorar/HLPRSTUVX
explicador/PS
extenso/JMPS
extirpar/HPRSTUVWX
extrajudicial/MS
extrapolar/HPRSTVX
extremar/NPRSTUVWX
fascinar/HLPRSTVWX
fatigar/HPRSTUVWX
filantrópico/MPS
filtrar/HLPRSTUVWX
financiar/HIPRSTUVX
firmar/PRSTUVWX
flirteo/PS
fluidificar/HPSTVWX
formar/HPRSTUVWX
fragmentar/HPRSTUVX
fraudulento/MPS
fresero/PS
friccionar/PRSTUVX
fruticultor/APS
galopar/LPSVWX
gasificar/HPRSTUVWX
gemoso/MPS
giróscopo/S
gobernar/HLPRSTUWX
grafo/AS
grasiento/MPS
grillar/NPRSVWX
groso/JS
gualdrapeo/PS
ha/S
horizontal/MS
horma/AS
identificar/HPRSTUVWX
igualar/HIPRSTVWX
ilotismo/S
ilustrar/HPRSTVWX
ilustre/JMS
impedir/LOQWYZ
importante/JS
importunar/HNPSTVWX
impuro/MPS
incubar/HPRSTVWX
indeterminado/MPS
ingreso/APS
inmejorable/MS
inmunizar/HPRSTVWX
insertar/PRSTUVX
inspirar/HNPRSTVWX
insulso/MPS
interesar/LPRSVX
investigar/HPRSTVWX
irreemplazable/MS
iterar/HPRSTVWX
junco/AS
légano/S
lateral/MS
laxar/HILPSVWX
lente/JS
lento/AJMPS
letificar/LPSVWX
leve/JMS
lomar/PSVWX
lujoso/AMPS
magnificente/JS
mal/AJPS
mancomunar/NPSVWX
mangonear/PSTVWX
marchar/LPRSVWX
masivo/MPS
matizar/HPRSTUVWX
medicinar/ILPSVWX
meloso/APS
migrar/HPSTVWX
mismo/JMPS
modelar/PRSTUVX
mollentar/PSVX
mordicar/HLPSVWX
morral/AS
mucho/AJPS
municipal/MS
musgo/APS
naturalizar/HPRSTVWX
nombrar/INPSTVWX
nopal/AJS
nove/JS
ocultar/HPRSTUVWX
omnipotente/MS
ordenar/HILNPRSTUVWX
palique/S
palo/APS
panzón/PS
peluquear/PRSTVWX
penetrar/HLPRSTVWX
perder/IOQRTUWX
perenne/MS
perfeccionar/IPRSTUVX
piño/APS
pleguete/S
ponderar/HNPSTVWX
postergar/HPSVWX
pote/JS
precioso/AMPS
premorir/LWY
preocupar/HNPRSVWX
preparar/HIPRSTUVWX
presagiar/PSVX
protocolizar/HPSTVWX
puntual/MS
puro/AJMPS
quebrar/ILPRSTWX
queso/AS
quimificar/HPSVWX
raquetero/PS
rebozar/PRSTUVWX
recatar/NPSVWX
recente/JS
recusar/HLPSVWX
reducir/IOQRTUWX
refundir/HOQRTVWX
regenerar/HPRSTVWX
reinicializar/HPRSTVWX
relumbroso/PS
rendir/HINRTWY
reparar/HIPRSTUVWX
repugnar/LPSVWX
resarcir/IOQRTVWX
resignar/HNPRSTVWX
reverendo/JPS
rico/AMPS
rogar/HPRSTWX
rostrata/S
ruidoso/AMPS
salificar/HPSVWX
sanear/IPSVWX
sayuelo/PS
seguir/INOQWY
separar/HNPRSTUVWX
sereno/AMJPS
simpatizar/LPSVWX
solapar/INPRSTUVWX
solercia/S
subir/ILOQRTUVWX
subyugar/HPRSTVX
sumare/JS
sustancial/MS
tabular/HS
taladro/APS
tapar/AIPRSTVWX
tegeo/PS
tertuliar/LPSVX
tojosita/S
trabar/AIPRSTVWX
trocar/INPRSTWX
trocear/PSTVWX
unir/OQRTUVWX
valuar/HPSWX
vaquero/PS
verruguetar/PSVX
verter/ILOQRTWX
viajar/LPSVWX
viejo/APS
violento/MPS
